Montana, session 2025, SB389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Mitigation. If a renter vacates a leased space early, the operator has a
duty to mitigate damages.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 70, chapter 6, part 6, and the provisions of Title 70, chapter 6, part 6, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 389